Washington statutes.
RCW 43.360.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Area" means a geographic area within a local government that is described by a closed perimeter boundary.

(2) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department.

(4) "Local government" means a city, code city, or town.

(5) "Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that has been designated by the department.

[ 2010 c 30 s 3; 2009 c 565 s 44; 2005 c 514 s 908.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 30: "Many of Washington's communities use the main street program to address issues facing their older traditional commercial districts. The main street program is a preservation-based economic development program that assists communities in implementing a locally driven downtown revitalization effort. However, the main street program is broader than merely preserving a community's downtown, it is the revitalization of that community's downtown. Downtown revitalization creates jobs and puts people to work. Downtown revitalization attracts new businesses and offers local investment opportunities. New and expanding downtown businesses generate increased sales tax and attract export dollars to the community. Therefore, the legislature finds that the movement of the main street program from the department of commerce to the department of archaeology and historic preservation is designed to provide for both the preservation of a community's downtown and economic development for that community." [ 2010 c 30 s 1.]

Effective date—2010 c 30: "This act takes effect July 1, 2010." [ 2010 c 30 s 7.]

Short title—2005 c 514 ss 901-912: See note following RCW 43.360.005.

Effective date—2005 c 514: See note following RCW 83.100.230.

Part headings not law—Severability—2005 c 514: See notes following RCW 82.12.808.